District of Columbia statutes.
42-1902.22

Sales offices, model units, etc.; authorization; when become common elements.

The declarant and the declarant’s authorized agents, representatives, and employees may maintain sales offices, management offices, and model units on the submitted land if and only if the condominium instruments provide for the same and specify the rights of the declarant with regard to the number, size, location, and relocation thereof. Any such sales office, management office, or model unit which is not designated a unit by the condominium instruments shall become a common element as soon as the declarant ceases to be a unit owner, and the declarant shall cease to have any rights with regard thereto unless such sales office, management office, or model unit is removed forthwith from the submitted land in accordance with a right reserved in the condominium instruments to make such removal.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title II, § 222, 23 DCR 9532b
This section is referenced in § 42-1901.02, § 42-1902.23, § 42-1902.30, and § 42-1903.09.
1981 Ed., § 45-1832.
1973 Ed., § 5-1232.